apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="veikšan/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vi/lnis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņa</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnim</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnī</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņa</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnis</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņu</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņus</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņos</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņi</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņi</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cietok/snis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņa</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snim</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sni</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snī</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sni</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sni</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņa</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>snis</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņu</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņiem</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņus</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņos</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņiem</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņi</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņiem</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šņi</l>
          <r>snis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="apzīmēšana"><i>apzīmēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atdalīšana"><i>atdalīšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atgūšana"><i>atgūšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="barošana"><i>barošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="beigšana"><i>beigšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cietoksnis"><i>cietok</i><par n="cietok/snis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ieņemšana"><i>ieņemšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izgatavošana"><i>izgatavošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izmantošana"><i>izmantošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izslēgšana"><i>izslēgšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="maršrutēšana"><i>maršrutēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="noslēgšana"><i>noslēgšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pabeigšana"><i>pabeigšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="programmēšana"><i>programmēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="uzturēšana"><i>uzturēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="valdīšana"><i>valdīšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="veikšana"><i>veikšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vilnis"><i>vi</i><par n="vi/lnis__n_m"/></e>
